Maryland, session 2026, HB0475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
9–209.1.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT KNOWINGLY HIRE OR RETAIN ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS
BEEN CONVICTED OF:
(1) ABDUCTION;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0475*

HOUSE BILL 475
(2) KIDNAPPING;
(3) MANSLAUGHTER, EXCEPT INVOLUNTARY MANSLAUGHTER;
(4) MURDER;
(5) RAPE;
(6) SEXUAL OFFENSE IN THE FIRST DEGREE OR SECOND DEGREE;
(7) CHILD ABUSE IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 3–601 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(8) SEXUAL ABUSE OF A MINOR UNDER § 3–602 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE;
(9) A FELONY OFFENSE UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 11 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(10) CONTINUING COURSE OF CONDUCT WITH A CHILD UNDER § 3–315
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(11) ASSAULT IN THE FIRST DEGREE;
(12) ASSAULT WITH INTENT TO MURDER;
(13) ASSAULT WITH INTENT TO RAPE; OR
(14) ASSAULT WITH INTENT TO COMMIT A SEXUAL OFFENSE IN THE
FIRST DEGREE OR SECOND DEGREE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY HIRE OR RETAIN AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF
A CRIME LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF THE JUDGMENT OF
CONVICTION FOR THE CRIME WAS REVERSED OR VACATED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.